Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5782.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 387. (1) A domestic credit union that is not a corporate credit union shall apply for and maintain insurance of member its share accounts and member deposit accounts from an agency of the federal government that provides that insurance.a federal agency authorized to insure share and deposit accounts or from a qualified private insurance organization. (2) A credit union that is denied a commitment for insurance of its share and deposit accounts by the an insuring federal agency or qualified private insurance organization, or that is given notice by the an insuring federal agency or qualified private insurance organization of the agency's insurer's intent to terminate insurance of the credit union's shares and deposits, shall either dissolve, merge with another credit union that is insured by an agency of the federal government, in accordance with subsection (1), or apply in writing to the commissioner within director not later than 30 days after the denial or notice for additional time to obtain an insurance commitment. (3) The commissioner director shall grant a credit union described in subsection (2) 1 or more additional periods of time to obtain or reinstate an insurance commitment if the commissioner director receives satisfactory evidence that the credit union has made or is making a substantial effort to meet the conditions required by the an insuring federal agency or qualified private insurance organization for issuance of an insurance commitment. (4) A credit union may contract with an insurance carrier licensed to do business in this state for insurance of the balances of its accounts that exceed the amount insured by the an insuring federal agency or qualified private insurance organization. (5) An insurance carrier that is licensed to do business in this state may submit an application to the department for authorization to provide insurance under this section as a qualified private insurance organization. The application must be on a form prescribed by the director. The director shall develop and implement the form of application and the standards for authorization under this subsection. (6) The director may deny or revoke an insurance carrier's authorization as a qualified private insurance organization if the director finds that the insurance carrier lacks the resources, governance, or management to adequately protect the share and deposit accounts of credit unions. (7) A credit union that converts to primary share or deposit insurance from a qualified private insurance organization must comply with state and federal law applicable to the conversion and must provide notice to the credit union's members as required under section 43 of the federal deposit insurance act, 12 USC 1831t, and 12 CFR part 708b. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Primary share or deposit insurance" means insurance of a share or deposit account of a credit union up to the same amount that is insurable by a federal agency authorized to insure share and deposit accounts. (b) "Qualified private insurance organization" means an insurance carrier that is licensed to do business in this state and is authorized by the director to provide primary share or deposit insurance under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5779. (b) House Bill No. 5780. (c) House Bill No. 5781. (d) House Bill No. 5783.